Rhode Island statutes. Title 17 Elections
Chapter 7 State Board of Elections

17-7-1.
Legislative intent.

It is the intent of the general assembly that the board of elections be a board on which all the qualified electors of the state, regardless of their political identification or the lack of it, will be eligible to serve. The governor, in making these appointments, and the senate, in confirming them, shall consider the abilities and integrity of the qualified electors under consideration and their knowledge of and/or experience in the working of the election laws of the state. They shall strive to select a board whose membership shall be representative of all citizens of the state and of their diverse points of view.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 312, § 2.

17-7-2.
Composition of board.

There shall be, independent of every other department and agency of this state, a board of elections consisting of seven (7) qualified electors of this state, of outstanding honesty and ability and none of whom shall hold any other public office or be employees of persons who hold state wide public office, but no person shall be disqualified solely because that person is a notary public, who shall be appointed by the governor with the advice and consent of the senate, as provided in this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 312, § 2; P.L. 1997, ch. 371, § 1.

17-7-3.
Appointment of members — Vacancies.

The governor shall forthwith upon June 8, 1979 appoint seven (7) members of initial terms as follows: one member upon initial appointment shall serve for a term of two (2) years; one member upon initial appointment shall serve for a term of four (4) years; one member upon initial appointment shall serve for a term of six (6) years; one member upon initial appointment shall serve for a term of eight (8) years; one member upon initial appointment shall serve for a term of ten (10) years; one member upon initial appointment shall serve for a term of twelve (12) years; one member upon initial appointment shall serve for a term of fourteen (14) years; and upon the expiration of the terms, the governor shall appoint persons for succeeding terms of fourteen (14) years, respectively. All members of the board appointed or reappointed after January 1, 2008, shall serve for terms of nine (9) years beginning in January 2008, and in January of every even numbered year thereafter, the chairperson and vice chairperson of the board shall be elected by majority vote of the members of the board.

In the event a vacancy occurs in the office of chairperson or vice chairperson after January 1, 2008, the board shall in the manner provided in subsection

17-7-3(a)

elect another of its members to be chairperson or vice chairperson, to fill the vacancy; provided, if the vacancy occurs as a result of death or resignation, the new chairperson or vice chairperson shall only fill the unexpired term.

In the event a vacancy occurs on the board, the governor shall appoint within thirty (30) days a new member to fill the vacancy; provided if the vacancy occurs as a result of death or resignation, the new member shall only fill the unexpired term. All appointments to fill vacancies shall be made in accordance with Article IX, section 5 of the Constitution of the state of Rhode Island and §§

36-1-10

through

36-1-12

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 312, § 2; P.L. 2007, ch. 522, § 1.

17-7-4.
Oath of members — Compensation.

Before entering upon his or her duties, each member of the board shall take an oath of office before the supreme court in which the member shall swear or affirm faithfully and impartially to administer the duties of his or her office without regard to partisan or political considerations. Members of the board of elections shall be compensated at the rate of seven thousand dollars ($7,000) per year.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 312, § 2; P.L. 1993, ch. 138, art. 65, § 2.

17-7-5.
Powers and duties — Quorum.

The state board shall have those functions, powers, and duties that are prescribed by this title or otherwise pursuant to law. In the exercise of these functions, powers, and duties, but without limitation to them, the board shall:

Exercise general supervision of the administration of the election law by local boards;

Furnish all binders, forms, cabinets, and other supplies required for the operation of the system of permanent registration of voters throughout the state, as provided by this title;

Require the correction of voting lists by any local board whenever the state board has information or cause to believe that any error exists in the lists and shall immediately notify the secretary of state of any corrections;

Prepare, package, and deliver election supplies to the various cities and towns for each voting district, except for supplies listed in this title for delivery by the office of the secretary of state;

Appoint, qualify, and assign all state inspectors of elections. The state board of elections shall formulate programs of instruction and shall determine the method and manner of instruction that shall be provided to the local boards and to the vendor providing training pursuant to any agreement between the state and the vendor for the training of election officials. The program of instruction shall include familiarization with the election laws and duties of various election officials, together with the exercise of sample situations that may be encountered in the process of voting; geographical boundaries of the voting district to which the official may be assigned; offices and questions that may be on the ballot; and any other information that the board of elections may deem appropriate. The availability of these programs of instruction for local boards shall be pursuant to the procedures, rules, and regulations adopted by the board of elections.

The board of elections shall also formulate and provide an informational pamphlet containing detailed instructions regarding the duties of elections officials and the operation of polling places. All informational pamphlets shall be distributed to the local boards that shall, in turn, see to their distribution to all election officials prior to any election.

Canvass and tabulate all votes cast at each state election and count, canvass, and tabulate the votes cast by mail voters as provided in this title;

Select dates for off-year and special election primaries, except the dates for any primaries for local elections that require fixing by the local board pursuant to chapter 15 of this title;

Furnish each elected candidate for all state or national offices a certificate of election;

Furnish the secretary of state with a certified statement of the number of votes cast in each voting district for all state and national candidates, the votes cast for and against all state questions that appeared on the ballot, and a certificate of election for each national candidate who is elected in this state, and furnish the governor with a certified list of the general officers elected at each general election;

Hold hearings relating to recounts or other protests of the results or conduct of an election;

Maintain any books and records of the votes cast and publish any statements and reports that it may deem to be in the public interest;

Arrange and make provisions for the registration of voters pursuant to the National Voter Registration Act (NVRA) of 1993, 52 U.S.C. § 20501 et seq. The state board shall formulate programs to assist those persons or organizations desiring to register voters and shall provide, pursuant to procedures, rules, and regulations it shall adopt, voter registrations services that may include training sessions, registration materials, manuals, and other services for the purpose of registering to vote eligible Rhode Island citizens;

Annually conduct a voter registration drive at each institution of higher education at the level of junior college or above in the state; and

Establish and maintain an administrative complaint procedure in accordance with Section 402 of the Help America Vote Act (P.L. 107-252) [52 U.S.C. § 21112].

The state board shall also have all of the powers and duties formerly conferred or imposed by existing law upon the division of elections and the election board, and whenever in any other general law, public law, act, or resolution of the general assembly, or any document, record, or proceeding authorized by the general assembly, the phrase “division of elections” or “election board” or any other word or words used in reference to or descriptive of the division, board, or any member or employee of the division or board, or to their respective activities or appointees, or any of them, the word, phrase, or reference shall, unless the context otherwise requires, be deemed to refer to and describe the state board, its members, appointees, and activities, as the context may require.

The state board shall have power to make any rules, regulations, and directives that it deems necessary to carry out the objects and purposes of this title not inconsistent with law.

The state board shall also have jurisdiction over all election matters on appeal from any local board and over any other matters pertinent and necessary to the proper supervision of the election laws.

Four (4) members of the state board shall constitute a quorum.

Notwithstanding the provisions of §

42-35-1

8(b)(7), all rules and regulations implementing and enforcing the provisions of the Help America Vote Act of 2002 (P.L. 107-252) [52 U.S.C. § 20901 et seq.] shall be promulgated in accordance with the rule-making provisions contained in §§

42-35-1

—

42-35-8

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 312, § 2; P.L. 1985, ch. 92, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 523, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 199, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 277, § 6; P.L. 1996, ch. 298, § 6; P.L. 2003, ch. 234, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 176, § 2; P.L. 2015, ch. 201, § 2.

17-7-6.
Secretary and assistants — Salaries.

The state board is authorized to appoint a secretary and necessary assistants who shall perform any duties that the board shall designate. The board shall fix the salaries of the secretary and assistants within the amount appropriated for those salaries by the general assembly, and the general assembly shall annually appropriate the sum or sums that it deems necessary for the payment of the salaries of the members of the board, its appointees and assistants, and for other necessary expenses in connection with their duties; and the controller is authorized and directed to draw his or her orders upon the general treasurer for the payment of this sum or as much of it that may be required from time to time, upon the receipt by the controller of proper vouchers approved by the chairperson, and in the absence of the chairperson, a member of the board designated by the chairperson in writing. The members of the state board, its secretary, assistants, and appointees, shall not be subject to the provisions relating to the state merit system, but shall be in the unclassified service and shall come under the regulations of the unclassified pay plan board.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 312, § 2.

17-7-7.
Seal of state board.

The state board shall have a seal, and shall cause the seal to be affixed to all certificates and statements issued by it.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 312, § 2.

17-7-8.
Hearings and investigations — Subpoena powers — False swearing.

Each member of the state board shall be authorized to administer oaths, and the board, in all cases of every nature pending before it, is authorized and empowered to summon witnesses by subpoena signed by the secretary of the board and to compel these witnesses to attend and testify in the same manner as witnesses are compelled to appear and testify in any court. The board is authorized to compel by its subpoena attested by its secretary, the production of all papers, books, documents, records, certificates, or other legal evidence that may be necessary or proper for the determination and decision of any question or the discharge of any duty required by law of the board, and every person disobeying any subpoena shall be considered as in contempt, and the board may punish any contempt of its authority in like manner as contempt may be punished by any court. Any person who shall willfully swear falsely in any proceeding, matter, or hearing before the state board shall be guilty of a felony.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 312, § 2.

17-7-9.
Voter fraud — Posting of penalties.

The state board of elections shall cause to be posted, in a conspicuous place at all polling locations, a poster stating that voter fraud is a felony with penalties enumerated in §§

17-23-4

and

17-26-1

and containing the statement: “You must be registered to vote from your actual place of residence.”

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 187, § 1.